Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Treasurer, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 33,341,660
(2) Trust property services ............ $ 8,219,148
(3) Investment services .................. $ 42,225,837
(4) Public savings services ............. $ 12,866,459
(5) State and local government
financial services ...................... $ 19,800,154
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the State Treasurer
for unclaimed property finders fees are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 14, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 2